Tennessee, session 114, HB0105.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 71-3-520(a), is amended by deleting
the language "to nonprofit organizations" from the first sentence of the subsection.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0105
000180
- 1 -